scripts/ru_lemmas/pos/v.lexd
LEXICON RuLemmasV
abêzd<v>:глотать<v>
абêзд<v>:глотать<v>
abêx̌tow<v>:глотать<v>
абêх̌тоw<v>:глотать<v>
aboz<v>:глотать<v>
абоз<v>:глотать<v>
abox̌t<v>:глотать<v>
абох̌т<v>:глотать<v>
abox̌č<v>:глотать<v>
абох̌ч<v>:глотать<v>
abêzd<v>:затягиваться<v>
абêзд<v>:затягиваться<v>
abêx̌tow<v>:затягиваться<v>
абêх̌тоw<v>:затягиваться<v>
aboz<v>:затягиваться<v>
абоз<v>:затягиваться<v>
abox̌t<v>:затягиваться<v>
абох̌т<v>:затягиваться<v>
abox̌č<v>:затягиваться<v>
абох̌ч<v>:затягиваться<v>
aw<v>:плакать<v>
аw<v>:плакать<v>
awd<v>:плакать<v>
аwд<v>:плакать<v>
awt<v>:плакать<v>
аwт<v>:плакать<v>
awtow<v>:плакать<v>
аwтоw<v>:плакать<v>
awč<v>:плакать<v>
аwч<v>:плакать<v>
haw<v>:плакать<v>
ҳаw<v>:плакать<v>
hawd<v>:плакать<v>
ҳаwд<v>:плакать<v>
awez<v>:вешать<v>
аwез<v>:вешать<v>
awezd<v>:вешать<v>
аwезд<v>:вешать<v>
awezdow<v>:вешать<v>
аwездоw<v>:вешать<v>
awezǰ<v>:вешать<v>
аwезҷ<v>:вешать<v>
aweӡ<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡ<v>:вешать<v>
aweӡd<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡд<v>:вешать<v>
aweӡdow<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡдоw<v>:вешать<v>
aweӡǰ<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡҷ<v>:вешать<v>
awez<v>:вешать<v>
аwез<v>:вешать<v>
awezd<v>:вешать<v>
аwезд<v>:вешать<v>
awezdow<v>:вешать<v>
аwездоw<v>:вешать<v>
awezǰ<v>:вешать<v>
аwезҷ<v>:вешать<v>
aweӡ<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡ<v>:вешать<v>
aweӡd<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡд<v>:вешать<v>
aweӡdow<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡдоw<v>:вешать<v>
aweӡǰ<v>:вешать<v>
аwеӡҷ<v>:вешать<v>
agān<v>:покрывать<v>
агāн<v>:покрывать<v>
agānt<v>:покрывать<v>
агāнт<v>:покрывать<v>
agāntow<v>:покрывать<v>
агāнтоw<v>:покрывать<v>
agānč<v>:покрывать<v>
агāнч<v>:покрывать<v>
aɣān<v>:покрывать<v>
ағ̌āн<v>:покрывать<v>
aɣānt<v>:покрывать<v>
ағ̌āнт<v>:покрывать<v>
aɣāntow<v>:покрывать<v>
ағ̌āнтоw<v>:покрывать<v>
aɣānč<v>:покрывать<v>
ағ̌āнч<v>:покрывать<v>
aθak<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
аθак<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
aθakt<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
аθакт<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
aθaktow<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
аθактоw<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
aθakč<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
аθакч<v>:тяжело_дышать<v>
aθêr<v>:передавать<v>
аθêр<v>:передавать<v>
aθêrt<v>:передавать<v>
аθêрт<v>:передавать<v>
aθêrtow<v>:передавать<v>
аθêртоw<v>:передавать<v>
aθêrč<v>:передавать<v>
аθêрч<v>:передавать<v>
ažêr<v>:мочить<v>
ажêр<v>:мочить<v>
ažêrt<v>:мочить<v>
ажêрт<v>:мочить<v>
ažêrtow<v>:мочить<v>
ажêртоw<v>:мочить<v>
ažêrč<v>:мочить<v>
ажêрч<v>:мочить<v>
nižêr<v>:мочить<v>
нижêр<v>:мочить<v>
nižêrt<v>:мочить<v>
нижêрт<v>:мочить<v>
nižêrtow<v>:мочить<v>
нижêртоw<v>:мочить<v>
nižêrč<v>:мочить<v>
нижêрч<v>:мочить<v>
ažir<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажир<v>:мокнуть<v>
ažirt<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажирт<v>:мокнуть<v>
ažirtow<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажиртоw<v>:мокнуть<v>
ažod<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажод<v>:мокнуть<v>
ažoɣǰ<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажоғ̌ҷ<v>:мокнуть<v>
ažīɣӡ<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажӣғ̌ӡ<v>:мокнуть<v>
ažūd<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажӯд<v>:мокнуть<v>
ažūyd<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажӯйд<v>:мокнуть<v>
ažūɣǰ<v>:мокнуть<v>
ажӯғ̌ҷ<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižir<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижир<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižirt<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижирт<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižirtow<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижиртоw<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižirč<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижирч<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižod<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижод<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižod<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижод<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižoɣǰ<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижоғ̌ҷ<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižīɣӡ<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижӣғ̌ӡ<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižūd<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижӯд<v>:мокнуть<v>
nižūɣǰ<v>:мокнуть<v>
нижӯғ̌ҷ<v>:мокнуть<v>
ambis<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбис<v>:обваливаться<v>
ambist<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбист<v>:обваливаться<v>
ambisč<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбисч<v>:обваливаться<v>
ambīθ<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбӣθ<v>:обваливаться<v>
ambīθt<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбӣθт<v>:обваливаться<v>
ambūst<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбӯст<v>:обваливаться<v>
ambūsč<v>:обваливаться<v>
амбӯсч<v>:обваливаться<v>
anak<v>:трудиться<v>
анак<v>:трудиться<v>
anakt<v>:трудиться<v>
анакт<v>:трудиться<v>
anaktow<v>:трудиться<v>
анактоw<v>:трудиться<v>
anakč<v>:трудиться<v>
анакч<v>:трудиться<v>
anafc<v>:мокнуть<v>
анафц<v>:мокнуть<v>
anafct<v>:мокнуть<v>
анафцт<v>:мокнуть<v>
anafctow<v>:мокнуть<v>
анафцтоw<v>:мокнуть<v>
anafcč<v>:мокнуть<v>
анафцч<v>:мокнуть<v>
anafc<v>:размягчаться<v>
анафц<v>:размягчаться<v>
anafct<v>:размягчаться<v>
анафцт<v>:размягчаться<v>
anafctow<v>:размягчаться<v>
анафцтоw<v>:размягчаться<v>
anafcč<v>:размягчаться<v>
анафцч<v>:размягчаться<v>
anafc<v>:распариться<v>
анафц<v>:распариться<v>
anafct<v>:распариться<v>
анафцт<v>:распариться<v>
anafctow<v>:распариться<v>
анафцтоw<v>:распариться<v>
anafcč<v>:распариться<v>
анафцч<v>:распариться<v>
ang<v>:плакать<v>
анг<v>:плакать<v>
angt<v>:плакать<v>
ангт<v>:плакать<v>
angtow<v>:плакать<v>
ангтоw<v>:плакать<v>
angč<v>:плакать<v>
ангч<v>:плакать<v>
angaxt<v>:попадать<v>
ангахт<v>:попадать<v>
angaxtow<v>:попадать<v>
ангахтоw<v>:попадать<v>
angaxc<v>:попадать<v>
ангахц<v>:попадать<v>
angaxct<v>:попадать<v>
ангахцт<v>:попадать<v>
angaxč<v>:попадать<v>
ангахч<v>:попадать<v>
angixt<v>:попадать<v>
ангихт<v>:попадать<v>
angixtow<v>:попадать<v>
ангихтоw<v>:попадать<v>
angixč<v>:попадать<v>
ангихч<v>:попадать<v>
ingaxc<v>:попадать<v>
ингахц<v>:попадать<v>
ingaxct<v>:попадать<v>
ингахцт<v>:попадать<v>
ingixt<v>:попадать<v>
ингихт<v>:попадать<v>
ingixtow<v>:попадать<v>
ингихтоw<v>:попадать<v>
ingixč<v>:попадать<v>
ингихч<v>:попадать<v>
yingaxc<v>:попадать<v>
йингахц<v>:попадать<v>
yingixt<v>:попадать<v>
йингихт<v>:попадать<v>
yingixtow<v>:попадать<v>
йингихтоw<v>:попадать<v>
yingixč<v>:попадать<v>
йингихч<v>:попадать<v>
angaxt<v>:задевать<v>
ангахт<v>:задевать<v>
angaxtow<v>:задевать<v>
ангахтоw<v>:задевать<v>
angaxc<v>:задевать<v>
ангахц<v>:задевать<v>
angaxct<v>:задевать<v>
ангахцт<v>:задевать<v>
angaxč<v>:задевать<v>
ангахч<v>:задевать<v>
angixt<v>:задевать<v>
ангихт<v>:задевать<v>
angixtow<v>:задевать<v>
ангихтоw<v>:задевать<v>
angixč<v>:задевать<v>
ангихч<v>:задевать<v>
ingaxc<v>:задевать<v>
ингахц<v>:задевать<v>
ingaxct<v>:задевать<v>
ингахцт<v>:задевать<v>
ingixt<v>:задевать<v>
ингихт<v>:задевать<v>
ingixtow<v>:задевать<v>
ингихтоw<v>:задевать<v>
ingixč<v>:задевать<v>
ингихч<v>:задевать<v>
yingaxc<v>:задевать<v>
йингахц<v>:задевать<v>
yingixt<v>:задевать<v>
йингихт<v>:задевать<v>
yingixtow<v>:задевать<v>
йингихтоw<v>:задевать<v>
yingixč<v>:задевать<v>
йингихч<v>:задевать<v>
angaxt<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахт<v>:заикаться<v>
angaxtow<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахтоw<v>:заикаться<v>
angaxc<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахц<v>:заикаться<v>
angaxct<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахцт<v>:заикаться<v>
angaxč<v>:заикаться<v>
ангахч<v>:заикаться<v>
angixt<v>:заикаться<v>
ангихт<v>:заикаться<v>
angixtow<v>:заикаться<v>
ангихтоw<v>:заикаться<v>
angixč<v>:заикаться<v>
ангихч<v>:заикаться<v>
ingaxc<v>:заикаться<v>
ингахц<v>:заикаться<v>
ingaxct<v>:заикаться<v>
ингахцт<v>:заикаться<v>
ingixt<v>:заикаться<v>
ингихт<v>:заикаться<v>
ingixtow<v>:заикаться<v>
ингихтоw<v>:заикаться<v>
ingixč<v>:заикаться<v>
ингихч<v>:заикаться<v>
yingaxc<v>:заикаться<v>
йингахц<v>:заикаться<v>
yingixt<v>:заикаться<v>
йингихт<v>:заикаться<v>
yingixtow<v>:заикаться<v>
йингихтоw<v>:заикаться<v>
yingixč<v>:заикаться<v>
йингихч<v>:заикаться<v>
angaxt<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
angaxtow<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахтоw<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
angaxc<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахц<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
angaxct<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахцт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
angaxč<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангахч<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
angixt<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангихт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
angixtow<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангихтоw<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
angixč<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ангихч<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ingaxc<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингахц<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ingaxct<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингахцт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ingixt<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингихт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ingixtow<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингихтоw<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ingixč<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
ингихч<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
yingaxc<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
йингахц<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
yingixt<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
йингихт<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
yingixtow<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
йингихтоw<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
yingixč<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
йингихч<v>:попадать_впросак<v>
angůx<v>:путать<v>
ангу̊х<v>:путать<v>
angůxt<v>:путать<v>
ангу̊хт<v>:путать<v>
angůxtow<v>:путать<v>
ангу̊хтоw<v>:путать<v>
angůxč<v>:путать<v>
ангу̊хч<v>:путать<v>
ingůx<v>:путать<v>
ингу̊х<v>:путать<v>
ingůxt<v>:путать<v>
ингу̊хт<v>:путать<v>
ingůxtow<v>:путать<v>
ингу̊хтоw<v>:путать<v>
ingůxč<v>:путать<v>
ингу̊хч<v>:путать<v>
angůx<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ангу̊х<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
angůxt<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ангу̊хт<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
angůxtow<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ангу̊хтоw<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
angůxč<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ангу̊хч<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ingůx<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ингу̊х<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ingůxt<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ингу̊хт<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ingůxtow<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ингу̊хтоw<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ingůxč<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
ингу̊хч<v>:заставлять_поперхнуться<v>
angůx<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ангу̊х<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
angůxt<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ангу̊хт<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
angůxtow<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ангу̊хтоw<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
angůxč<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ангу̊хч<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ingůx<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ингу̊х<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ingůxt<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ингу̊хт<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ingůxtow<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ингу̊хтоw<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ingůxč<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
ингу̊хч<v>:вводить_в_нужду<v>
andiz<v>:вставать<v>
андиз<v>:вставать<v>
andiӡ<v>:вставать<v>
андиӡ<v>:вставать<v>
andoyd<v>:вставать<v>
андойд<v>:вставать<v>
andoyǰ<v>:вставать<v>
андойҷ<v>:вставать<v>
andīdow<v>:вставать<v>
андӣдоw<v>:вставать<v>
andīzd<v>:вставать<v>
андӣзд<v>:вставать<v>
andīc<v>:вставать<v>
андӣц<v>:вставать<v>
andīӡd<v>:вставать<v>
андӣӡд<v>:вставать<v>
andūyd<v>:вставать<v>
андӯйд<v>:вставать<v>
andūyǰ<v>:вставать<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:вставать<v>
indiz<v>:вставать<v>
индиз<v>:вставать<v>
indoyd<v>:вставать<v>
индойд<v>:вставать<v>
indoyǰ<v>:вставать<v>
индойҷ<v>:вставать<v>
indīdow<v>:вставать<v>
индӣдоw<v>:вставать<v>
indīzd<v>:вставать<v>
индӣзд<v>:вставать<v>
indīc<v>:вставать<v>
индӣц<v>:вставать<v>
indūyd<v>:вставать<v>
индӯйд<v>:вставать<v>
indūyǰ<v>:вставать<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:вставать<v>
yindiz<v>:вставать<v>
йиндиз<v>:вставать<v>
andiz<v>:вставать<v>
андиз<v>:вставать<v>
andiӡ<v>:вставать<v>
андиӡ<v>:вставать<v>
andoyd<v>:вставать<v>
андойд<v>:вставать<v>
andoyǰ<v>:вставать<v>
андойҷ<v>:вставать<v>
andīdow<v>:вставать<v>
андӣдоw<v>:вставать<v>
andīzd<v>:вставать<v>
андӣзд<v>:вставать<v>
andīc<v>:вставать<v>
андӣц<v>:вставать<v>
andīӡd<v>:вставать<v>
андӣӡд<v>:вставать<v>
andūyd<v>:вставать<v>
андӯйд<v>:вставать<v>
andūyǰ<v>:вставать<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:вставать<v>
indiz<v>:вставать<v>
индиз<v>:вставать<v>
indoyd<v>:вставать<v>
индойд<v>:вставать<v>
indoyǰ<v>:вставать<v>
индойҷ<v>:вставать<v>
indīdow<v>:вставать<v>
индӣдоw<v>:вставать<v>
indīzd<v>:вставать<v>
индӣзд<v>:вставать<v>
indīc<v>:вставать<v>
индӣц<v>:вставать<v>
indūyd<v>:вставать<v>
индӯйд<v>:вставать<v>
indūyǰ<v>:вставать<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:вставать<v>
yindiz<v>:вставать<v>
йиндиз<v>:вставать<v>
andiz<v>:уходить<v>
андиз<v>:уходить<v>
andiӡ<v>:уходить<v>
андиӡ<v>:уходить<v>
andoyd<v>:уходить<v>
андойд<v>:уходить<v>
andoyǰ<v>:уходить<v>
андойҷ<v>:уходить<v>
andīdow<v>:уходить<v>
андӣдоw<v>:уходить<v>
andīzd<v>:уходить<v>
андӣзд<v>:уходить<v>
andīc<v>:уходить<v>
андӣц<v>:уходить<v>
andīӡd<v>:уходить<v>
андӣӡд<v>:уходить<v>
andūyd<v>:уходить<v>
андӯйд<v>:уходить<v>
andūyǰ<v>:уходить<v>
андӯйҷ<v>:уходить<v>
indiz<v>:уходить<v>
индиз<v>:уходить<v>
indoyd<v>:уходить<v>
индойд<v>:уходить<v>
indoyǰ<v>:уходить<v>
индойҷ<v>:уходить<v>
indīdow<v>:уходить<v>
индӣдоw<v>:уходить<v>
indīzd<v>:уходить<v>
индӣзд<v>:уходить<v>
indīc<v>:уходить<v>
индӣц<v>:уходить<v>
indūyd<v>:уходить<v>
индӯйд<v>:уходить<v>
indūyǰ<v>:уходить<v>
индӯйҷ<v>:уходить<v>
yindiz<v>:уходить<v>
йиндиз<v>:уходить<v>
andiz<v>:отставать<v>
андиз<v>:отставать<v>
andiӡ<v>:отставать<v>
андиӡ<v>:отставать<v>
andoyd<v>:отставать<v>
андойд<v>:отставать<v>
andoyǰ<v>:отставать<v>
андойҷ<v>:отставать<v>
andīdow<v>:отставать<v>
